Washington statutes.
RCW 16.76.005

Finding.

The legislature finds that there is a need to provide resources to help livestock producers adapt their operations in light of the recovery of wolves on the landscape and a desire by many to increase use of nonlethal deterrence measures to reduce the probability of livestock depredations by wolves. The application of resources in support of these goals must respect livestock producers' values of independence, privacy, and local decision making. The legislature further recognizes that the recent recolonization of wolves places a relatively large time and monetary burden on livestock producers, and that livestock producers have unique and valuable knowledge, occupy an important place in their local communities and the state's social fabric, and are critical partners in creating sound natural resource policies.

[ 2017 c 257 s 1.]